Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB239.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Mandate Waiver Program.--(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a governing body may adopt a resolution to apply to the department for a waiver of one or more provisions of this act, regulations of the State Board, standards of the secretary, policies or guidance of the department or any other provisions of law permitted to be waived under this section to enable the school entity to improve instructional programs or operate in a more effective, efficient or economical manner.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The application for a waiver shall be submitted in a manner and on a form established by the department. The application may only require applicants to:(1) Specify the provisions of this act, regulations of the State Board, standards of the secretary or policies or guidance of the department for which the applicant is seeking a waiver.(2) Include the reasons why the waiver is being requested.(3) Provide supporting data or information to explain the benefits expected to be obtained as a result of the waiver.(c) Each application for waiver shall be adopted by a resolution of a governing body at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body. Approval from the department shall be required prior to implementing the waiver.(d) The department, in considering each waiver application:(1) May not impose any additional requirements on the waiver applicant other than the requirements specified in this section.(2) Shall approve any waiver application that:(i) Complies with the application process and provides all information required in the application form developed by the department under subsection (b).(ii) Does not conflict with a provision of Federal law or regulation or any other law or regulation that is not permitted to be waived under this section.(e) The department shall have thirty (30) days from receipt of the waiver application to issue a written approval, disapproval or request modifications to the application. If the department fails to act within that time period, the waiver application shall be deemed to be approved.(f) (1) If the department requests modification to or disapproves the waiver application, the specific reasons for the 20250SB0239PN0193 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department's request or disapproval shall be transmitted to the waiver applicant.(2) If the department denies an application, the response to the applicant shall include an explanation of any provision of law, regulation of the State Board, standard of the secretary or policies or guidance of the department that is not subject to waiver under this section and would be violated if the application were granted.(3) The waiver applicant may submit a revised application for a waiver in accordance with subsection (c).(4) A waiver applicant may appeal a disapproval to the secretary pursuant to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and 7 (relating to judicial review). A waiver applicant shall not be required to revise and resubmit the waiver application prior to appealing a disapproval.(g) A waiver shall remain in effect permanently unless rescinded by the governing body or found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be in violation of subsection (d)(2)(ii).(h) The department shall approve a waiver of section 751 if the governing body indicates in its application that the governing body intends to solicit multiple prime and single prime construction bids and award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.(i) The following shall not be subject to waiver pursuant to this section:(1) The following provisions of this act: sections 106, 108, 110, 111, 111.1, 321, 322, 323, 324, 325, 326, 327, 328, 431, 436, 437, 440.1, 443, 513, 518, 527, 701.1, 708, 740, 741, 752, 753, 771, 776, 785, 808, 809, 810, 1073, 1073.1, 1076, 1077, 1080, 1302, 1303, 1310, 1310.1, 1317, 1317.2, 1318, 1327, 20250SB0239PN0193 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1327.1, 1327.2, 1330, 1332, 1361, 1366, 1501, 1502, 1513, 1517, 1518, 1521, 1523, 1526, 1546 and 1547, provisions prohibiting discrimination, Articles VI, VI-A, XI, XI-A, XII, XIII-A, XIII-B, XIII-C, XIII-D, XIII-E, XIV, XVII-A and this section.(2) The following provisions of 22 Pa. Code (relating to education):Chapter 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment).Chapter 10 (relating to safe schools).Chapter 11 (relating to student attendance).Chapter 12 (relating to students and student services).Chapter 14 (relating to special education services and programs).Chapter 15 (relating to protected handicapped students).Chapter 16 (relating to special education for gifted students).Chapter 23 (relating to pupil transportation).Chapter 235 (relating to Code of Professional Practice and Conduct for Educators).Chapter 711 (relating to charter school and cyber charter school services and programs for children with disabilities).(3) For intermediate units, Article IX-A and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 17 (relating to intermediate units).(4) For area career and technical schools, Article XVIII and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 339 (relating to vocational education).(j) The department shall maintain and annually update a listing of all approved waiver applications on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The listing shall include the name of the school entity and the provisions of law, regulation, standard of the secretary or policies or guidance of the department for which waivers were granted.20250SB0239PN0193 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or preempt any provisions of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this subsection.(l) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Governing body." A board of school directors or other governing authority of a school entity."School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, area career and technical school or intermediate unit."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."State Board." The State Board of Education."Waiver applicant." A school entity that applies for a waiver under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0239PN0193 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718